Missouri, session 2026, HB3109.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 8, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 8.218, to read as follows:
8.218. 1. No person shall willfully or knowingly, with the intent to impede,
disrupt, or disturb the orderly conduct of official business in the capitol building:
(1) Enter or remain in any room of the capitol building designated for the use of
the general assembly or for a committee, officer, or employee of the general assembly;
(2) Utter loud, threatening, or abusive language;
(3) Engage in disorderly or disruptive conduct;
(4) Obstruct or impede passage; or
(5) Engage in an act of physical violence.
2. A violation of subsection 1 of this section shall be a class C misdemeanor. A
second or subsequent offense shall be a class B misdemeanor.
3. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit any act performed in the
lawful discharge of official duties by:
(1) A member of the general assembly;
(2) An employee of a member of the general assembly; or
(3) An officer or employee of the general assembly or any committee thereof.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.